Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-701
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 55-701 to 55-704:

(1) Military service means:

(a) In the case of a servicemember who is a member or reserve member of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard, full-time duty in the active military service of the United States, including:

(i) Full-time training duty;

(ii) Annual training duty; and

(iii) Attendance while at a school designated as a service school by federal law or by the secretary of the military department concerned;

(b) In the case of a member or reserve member of the Nebraska National Guard, service under a call to active service or duty authorized by:

(i) The President of the United States or the Secretary of Defense for a period of more than thirty days in response to a national emergency declared by the President of the United States; or

(ii) The Governor for a period of more than thirty consecutive days;

(c) In the case of a servicemember who is a commissioned officer of the United States Public Health Service or the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, active service; or

(d) Any period during which a servicemember is absent from duty on account of sickness, wounds, leave, or other lawful cause; and

(2) Servicemember means an individual engaged in military service.

Laws 2018, LB682, § 1.